Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-207
Appropriation; no land to be crossed by more than one ditch.

No tract of land shall be crossed by more than one ditch, canal or lateral without the written consent and agreement of the owners thereof, if the first ditch, canal or lateral can be made to answer the purpose for which the second is desired or intended.

Laws 1889, c. 68, § 3, p. 504;

R.S.1913, § 3377;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 1, § 9, p. 832;

C.S.1922, § 8414;

C.S.1929, § 46-509;

R.S.1943, § 46-207.

No tract of land shall, without consent of owner, be burdened with two or more ditches for watering of same territory. Walker v. Anderson, 90 Neb. 119, 132 N.W. 937 (1911); Paxton & Hershey Irr. C. & L. Co. v. Farmers & Merchants Irr. & L. Co., 45 Neb. 884, 64 N.W. 343 (1895).